Massachusetts, session 194th, S52.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 6C of chapter 20 of the General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 49 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking out subsection (a) and
inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(a) There shall be established a Massachusetts food policy council, hereinafter referred to
as the council. The council shall consist of 20 members, 1 of whom shall be a member of the
house of representatives; 1 of whom shall be a member of the senate; 1 of whom shall be a
member of the house of representatives who shall be appointed by the minority leader of the
house of representatives; 1 of whom shall be a member of the senate who shall be appointed by
the minority leader of the senate; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of agricultural resources,
or the commissioner's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of public health, or the
commissioner's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of elementary and secondary
education, or the commissioner's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner of
of 3

environmental protection, or the commissioner's designee; 1 of whom shall be the commissioner
of transitional assistance or the commissioner's designee; 1 of whom shall be the secretary of
economic development, or the secretary's designee; 1 of whom shall be the director of the
division of marine fisheries of the department of fish and game, or the director’s designee; 1 of
whom shall be an expert in healthy soils practices as defined in section 7A of chapter 128,
appointed by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs; 1 of whom shall be the director
of the University of Massachusetts Center for Agriculture, Food, and the Environment, or the
director’s designee; and 7 of whom shall be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a
farmer or representative of a farm organization, 1 of whom shall represent food distribution,
processing and marketing interests, 1 of whom shall represent direct-to-consumer marketing
efforts, 1 of whom shall represent a local health department addressing food safety and nutrition,
1 of whom shall be an expert in food safety, 1 of whom shall be an expert in food processing and
handling; and 1 of whom shall represent community-based efforts addressing nutrition and
public health.
SECTION 2. Said section 6C of said chapter 20 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
hereby further amended by inserting after the last sentence of subsection (c) the following 4
sentences:-
Advisory committee members may be eligible for compensation at a rate fixed by the
council, as approved by the chief financial officer of the department of agricultural resources to
ensure appropriate funds are available to cover the costs. Advisory committee members shall be
eligible for compensation only to the extent otherwise permitted by chapter 268A of the general
laws and upon providing the necessary documentation required to process any such payment.
Any request for compensation shall be made by the advisory committee member to the
of 3

department of agricultural resources within 30 days of being incurred. Requests made after this
time may be ineligible for payment.
of 3